Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 31

Corrections Resources Commission

12-31-101 — 12-31-104. [Repealed.]

12-32-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Correctional or detention facility” means:

A local or state correctional facility or detention facility that has the power to detain or restrain a person under the laws of the state, including a city jail, county jail, or facility operated by the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction; or

A post-incarceration residential reentry facility designed to house a person on parole;

“Detainee” includes a person detained under the immigration laws of the United States;

“Inmate” means any person incarcerated in a correctional or detention facility for any reason;

“Labor” means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix;

“Post-partum” means, as determined by the physician of the inmate or detainee, the thirty-day period following delivery of a child; and

“Restraints” means a physical restraint or mechanical device used to control the movement of an inmate's or detainee's body or limbs, including without limitation:

Flex cuffs;

Soft restraints;

Hard metal handcuffs;

A black box;

Chubb cuffs;

Leg irons;

Belly chains;

A security tether or chain;

A convex shield; and

Restraints connecting more than one (1) inmate or detainee.

“Restraints” does not include a door to a room.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 566, § 1.

12-32-102. Restraint of pregnant inmate or detainee.

A correctional or detention facility shall not place an inmate or detainee verified to be pregnant, in labor, or in post-partum recovery in restraints unless:

The correctional or detention facility makes a reasonable and individualized determination that the inmate or detainee presents a substantial flight risk; or

An extraordinary medical or security circumstance dictates that the inmate or detainee be restrained to:

Ensure the safety and security of:

The inmate, detainee, or child;

The staff of the correctional or detention facility, or medical facility;

Other inmates or detainees; or

The public; or

Prevent the risk of escape by the inmate or detainee that cannot be reasonably minimized through a safer method than restraints.

If the correctional or detention facility determines that the inmate or detainee is required to be restrained under subsection (a) of this section, the restraints shall be removed if a physician, nurse, or other health professional requests that the inmate or detainee not be restrained.

The physician, nurse, or other health professional providing inmate or detainee obstetric care shall have final decision-making authority on the use of restraints while the inmate or detainee is in labor or delivery.

If the inmate or detainee is not under the care of a physician, nurse, or other health professional, the official at the correctional or detention facility primarily responsible for medical care of inmates or detainees shall have final decision-making authority on the use of restraints and shall consult with a physician, nurse, or other healthcare provider who specializes in obstetrics about the use of restraints on the inmate or detainee.

If restraints are used on a pregnant inmate or detainee under subsection (a) of this section:

The type of restraints shall be the least restrictive type necessary, and the restraints shall be applied in the least restrictive manner necessary.

Leg or waist restraints shall not be used on any inmate or detainee who is in labor.

Leg restraints shall not be used on a pregnant inmate who is not in a wheelchair, bed, or gurney;

The restraints shall always be forward-facing, designed to restrain the person's hands in front of the person to protect the person and others;

Only soft restraints may be used; and

The correctional or detention facility shall make written findings within ten (10) days regarding the substantial flight risk of that inmate or detainee or other extraordinary medical or security circumstance that dictated the inmate or detainee be restrained to ensure the safety and security of the inmate or detainee, the child, staff of the correctional or detention facility, or medical facility, other inmates or detainees, or the public.

The written findings under subdivision (c)(4)(A) of this section shall be maintained by the correctional or detention facility for at least five (5) years and be made available for public inspection, except that information identifying any inmate or detainee or that could lead to the identification of the inmate or detainee shall not be made public.

If restraints are used during labor, the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction, as applicable, shall report the use of restraints during labor to the Board of Corrections and to the Attorney General.

Necessary prenatal vitamins and nutrition for pregnant inmates and detainees;

A necessary number of hygiene products for female inmates and detainees;

A necessary number of undergarments for female inmates and detainees;

A lower bunk for a pregnant inmate or detainee; and

Unless otherwise provided for by the correctional or detention facility, access for a pregnant inmate or detainee to nonprofit educational programming, such as prenatal care, pregnancy-specific hygiene, and parenting classes.

[Reserved.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 34, provided:

“LOCAL GOVERNMENT INMATE COST REPORT. Each calendar year, the Association of Arkansas Counties shall compile and submit a report to the Arkansas Legislative Council, of all costs incurred, excluding construction costs, by local government units housing inmates sentenced to the Department of Correction and Department of Community Correction. The cost report shall be a representative sample of all counties housing and caring for state inmates. The report shall be submitted no later than July 1 of the calendar year immediately following the reporting year.

“The Association of Arkansas Counties in coordination with Legislative Audit shall determine which counties will be included in the sample and shall include a sufficient number of counties from each classification based upon population and each congressional district to ensure a fair representation of costs incurred. Guidelines for preparing this cost report shall be developed by the Division of Legislative Audit in coordination with the Association of Arkansas Counties. The Division of Legislative Audit shall test the accuracy of the information submitted during the routine audit of the applicable county.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 34, provided: “LOCAL GOVERNMENT INMATE COST REPORT. Each calendar year, the Association of Arkansas Counties shall compile and submit a report to the Arkansas Legislative Council, of all costs incurred, excluding construction costs, by local government units housing inmates sentenced to the Department of Correction and Department of Community Correction. The cost report shall be a representative sample of all counties housing and caring for state inmates. The report shall be submitted no later than July 1 of the calendar year immediately following the reporting year.

“The Association of Arkansas Counties in coordination with Legislative Audit shall determine which counties will be included in the sample and shall include a sufficient number of counties from each classification based upon population and each congressional district to ensure a fair representation of costs incurred. Guidelines for preparing this cost report shall be developed by the Division of Legislative Audit in coordination with the Association of Arkansas Counties. The Division of Legislative Audit shall test the accuracy of the information submitted during the routine audit of the applicable county.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Cross References. State correctional facilities, good time allowance, §12-29-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1979, No. 639, § 6: approved Mar. 28, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that there is an immediate need for ‘meritorious good time’ and temporary emergency release of inmates in order to encourage good discipline, good behavior, and efficiency within the county and city jail system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its enactment.”

Acts 2015, No. 741, § 6: Jan. 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 48:

“(a)Sections 11, 12, 13, and 20 of this act are effective on and after September 1, 2015.

“(b)Sections 46 and 47 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1979, No. 639, § 1, subsection (a) began: “From the effective date of this Act,.” The effective date of Acts 1979, No. 639 was March 28, 1979.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), inserted “jail” after “county” and substituted “his or her sentence to be served in the county jail or city jail” for “up to ten (10) days for each month served in the county or city jails maintained in the State of Arkansas by the various counties and municipalities”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “Meritorious good time” for “It”, deleted “the provisions of” preceding “this subchapter”, and inserted “jail” following “county”.

The authority to grant or deny meritorious good time to a county inmate belongs to the sheriff of the county to whose jail an inmate is committed, not to the judge ordering the commitment. Upton v. State, 68 Ark. App. 84, 4 S.W.3d 510 (1999).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “of the county jail or city jail” in (b); substituted “a one (1) day reduction for each day served” for “ten (10) days’ reduction for each month served” in (c)(1); substituted “ten (10) days’ reduction” for“five (5) days’ reduction” in (c)(2); substituted “Inmates” for “Those” in (c)(2) and (c)(3); inserted “jail” following “county” in (d); and deleted (e).

History.

Acts 2019, No. 566, § 1.

12-32-103. Necessary female prenatal nutrition and hygiene products required.

A correctional or detention facility shall establish a policy for providing:

A policy under this section may be approved annually by the Charitable, Penal and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 566, § 1.

Chapters 33-40

[Reserved.]